Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-634.01
Prohibited acts.

It shall be a violation
of the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act for any person to (1)
deny access to any officer, agent, employee, or appointee of the department
or offer any resistance to, thwart, or hinder such persons by misrepresentation
or concealment, (2) violate a stop-movement order issued under section 54-628.01,
(3) fail to disclose all locations housing dogs or cats owned or controlled
by such person, or (4) fail to pay any administrative fine levied pursuant
to section 54-633.

Laws 2009, LB241, § 9.